Maryland, session 2026, SB0409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–2A–07.
(a) The president of the county board is entitled to receive [$17,000] $25,000
annually as compensation, the vice president is entitled to receive [$16,000] $24,000
annually as compensation, and, except for the student member, the other board members
are entitled to receive [$15,000] $23,000 each annually as compensation.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0409*

SENATE BILL 409
(b) A student member who completes a full term on the county board shall be
granted a scholarship [of $15,000] to be applied toward the student’s higher education costs
IN THE FOLLOWING AMOUNT:
(1) $15,000 FOR A TERM THAT BEGINS BEFORE JULY 1, 2029; AND
(2) $23,000 FOR A TERM THAT BEGINS ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2029.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the president, vice president, members, and student member
of the Anne Arundel County Board of Education while serving in a term of office beginning
before the effective date of this Act, but the provisions of this Act concerning the salary or
compensation of the president, vice president, members, and student member of the Anne
Arundel County Board of Education shall take effect at the beginning of the next following
term of office. This limitation does not apply to an individual appointed or elected after the
effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.